West Virginia, session 2026, HB4089.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5. GENERAL POWERS AND AUTHORITY OF THE GOVERNOR, SECRETARY OF STATE AND ATTORNEY GENERAL; BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS; MISCELLANEOUS AGENCIES, COMMISSIONS, OFFICES, PROGRAMS, ETC. ARTICLE 16. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES INSURANCE ACT. §5-16-8b. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.(b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. CHAPTER 9. HUMAN SERVICES. ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.(b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. CHAPTER 33. INSURANCE. ARTICLE 15. ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-15-4a. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) This section shall be known and cited as "Jessica Huffman's Law".(b) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.	(c) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. ARTICLE 16. GROUP ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-16-20. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.(b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy.ARTICLE 24. HOSPITAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS, MEDICAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS, DENTAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS AND HEALTH SERVICE CORPORATIONS. §33-24-15. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.(b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. ARTICLE 25. HEALTH CARE CORPORATIONS. §33-25-23. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose. (b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. ARTICLE 25A. HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION ACT. §33-25A-37. Required coverage for scalp cooling system for cancer chemotherapy treatment. (a) For the purpose of this section, "scalp cooling system" means any device used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer chemotherapy treatment, provided that such device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose. (b) Any insurer who delivers or issues a policy, plan, or contact that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, under the provisions of this article and provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.  Coverage provided under this section may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner and as are consistent with those established for other benefits within a given policy. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home